Tennessee, session 114, HB0610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-1-114(2), is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days" and substituting "fifteen (15) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0610
002202
- 1 -